Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.531

Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from a final order in a proceeding under this article in accordance with expedited appellate procedures in other civil cases relating to minor children. Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order under RCW 26.27.231, the enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child custody determination pending appeal.

[ 2001 c 65 s 314.]